Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1103
Accredited dental hygiene program, defined.

Accredited dental hygiene program means a program that is accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation, which is an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as an accrediting body, that is within a school or college approved by the board, and that requires a dental hygiene curriculum of not less than two academic years.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 436.